California, session 20252026, SB1366.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.Section 25213.5 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:25213.5.(a)In administering or approving any program, the commission shall comply with the California Prompt Payment Act (Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 927) of Part 3 of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code).(b)(1)The commission shall ensure that payment timelines, advance payment structures, and accountability measures required under the California Prompt Payment Act are incorporated into program designs, implementation plans, and cost recovery authorizations.(2)Notwithstanding any other law, payment shall be made within 45 calendar days from receipt of an invoice. An invoice shall not be disputed on the basis of a minor or technical defect in order to circumvent or avoid the general intent of any of the specifics of this section.(3)Interest on late payment penalties shall accrue automatically and shall not be waived by contract terms.(4)The commission shall provide a minimum advance payment of 25 percent, unless a written justification is provided. If the nonprofit organization has been in good standing with the state for at least three years, the commission shall provide an advanced payment of 100 percent, unless a written justification is provided.(c)The commission shall not structure procurement or payment terms in a way that unreasonably restricts participation by small businesses, nonprofit organizations, community-based organizations, or suppliers certified pursuant to General Order 156. (d)(1)The commission shall annually submit a report to the Legislature that includes all of the following:(A)The information provided in the report required pursuant to Section 927.9 of the Government Code.(B)The number of invoices submitted to the commission that were considered disputed.(C)The number of invoices that were paid by the commission more than 45 days after receipt.(D)Steps taken to mitigate cashflow barriers to the entities identified in subdivision (c) during procurement design.(2)A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SEC. 2.Section 701.7 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:701.7.(a)In administering or approving any ratepayer-funded program, the commission shall comply with the California Prompt Payment Act (Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 927) of Part 3 of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code).(b)(1)The commission shall ensure that payment timelines, advance payment structures, and accountability measures required under the California Prompt Payment Act are incorporated into program designs, implementation plans, and cost recovery authorizations.(2)Notwithstanding any other law, payment shall be made within 45 calendar days from receipt of an invoice. An invoice shall not be disputed on the basis of a minor or technical defect in order to circumvent or avoid the general intent of any of the specifics of this section.(3)Interest on late payment penalties shall accrue automatically and shall not be waived by contract terms.(4)The commission shall provide a minimum advance payment of 25 percent, unless a written justification is provided. If the nonprofit organization has been in good standing with the state for at least three years, the commission shall provide an advanced payment of 100 percent, unless a written justification is provided.(c)The commission shall not structure procurement or payment terms in a way that unreasonably restricts participation by small businesses, nonprofit organizations, community-based organizations, or suppliers certified pursuant to General Order 156.(d)This section does not alter the commission’s ratemaking authority or obligation to protect ratepayers.SEC. 3.SECTION 1. Section 910.11 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:910.11. The commission shall annually submit a report to the Legislature that includes all of the following:(a) The information provided in the report required pursuant to Section 927.9 of the Government Code.(b) The number of invoices submitted to the commission that were considered disputed. (c) The number of invoices that were paid by the commission more than 45 days after receipt. (d) Steps taken to mitigate cashflow barriers to the entities identified in subdivision (c) of Section 701.7 during procurement design. of small businesses and diverse suppliers participating in programs administered by the commission.SEC. 4.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.